North Carolina, session 2025, HB57.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. State veterans history museum.
The Veterans History Museum of the Carolinas, located in Transylvania County, is adopted
as the official Veterans History Museum of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H57-v-1*